Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2726
General index; contents.

The general index to probate records shall contain an alphabetical list of all estate matters brought before the court, the file number of the estate, the name of each estate administered upon, or guardianship or other probate matter presented to the court for its determination, the number and page of the fee book in which the costs are taxed in each matter, and the book and page in the probate record where all such matters are recorded, sufficiently definite to enable the finding of such proceedings from the general index.

G.S.1873, c. 14, § 33, p. 270;

Laws 1909, c. 41, § 1, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 1233;

C.S.1922, § 1156;

C.S.1929, § 27-535;

R.S.1943, § 24-538;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 57;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-557.